Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-141
Injunction; damages; attorney's fees.

Any owner of a mark registered under the Trademark Registration Act may enjoin the manufacture, use, display, or sale of any counterfeits or imitations of the mark and any court of competent jurisdiction may grant injunctions to restrain such manufacture, use, display, or sale as the court determines to be just and reasonable. A defendant may be required to pay to the owner all profits derived from and all damages suffered by reason of the wrongful manufacture, use, display, or sale. The court may also order that any such counterfeits or imitations in the possession or under the control of any defendant be delivered to an officer of the court, or to the complainant, to be destroyed. The court, in its discretion, may enter judgment for an amount not to exceed such profits and damages and reasonable attorney's fees of the prevailing party in such cases where the court finds the other party committed such wrongful acts with knowledge or in bad faith or otherwise as according to the circumstances of the case. The enumeration of any right or remedy under the act does not affect a registrant's right to prosecute under any penal law of this state.

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 16.